Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.040

Purchase of tuition units or establishment of savings plans by organizations—Rules—Scholarship fund.

The governing body may, at its discretion, allow an organization to purchase tuition units or establish savings plans for future use as scholarships. Such organizations electing to purchase tuition units or establish Washington college savings program accounts for this purpose must enter into a contract with the governing body which, at a minimum, ensures that the scholarship shall be freely given by the purchaser to a scholarship recipient. For such purchases, the purchaser need not name a beneficiary until four months before the date when the tuition units are first expected to be used.

The governing body shall formulate and adopt such rules as are necessary to determine which organizations may qualify to purchase tuition units or establish Washington college savings program accounts for scholarships under this section. The governing body also may consider additional rules for the use of tuition units or Washington college savings program accounts if purchased as scholarships.

The governing body may establish a scholarship fund with moneys from the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account. A scholarship fund established under this authority shall be administered by the office and shall be provided to students who demonstrate financial need. Financial need is not a criterion that any other organization need consider when using tuition units as scholarships. The office also may establish its own corporate-sponsored scholarship fund under this chapter.

[ 2016 c 69 s 8; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 171; 1997 c 289 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.